Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 10
Arkansas Local Police And Fire Retirement System

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6341, provided: “Effect of transfer on retirement system membership and health insurance plan participation.

“(a)

As used in this section, ‘retirement system’ means:

“(1)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq.;

“(2)

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-5-103;

“(3)

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-4-103;

“(4)

The State Police Retirement System, established by § 24-6-203;

“(5)

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, established by § 24-8-201 et seq.;

“(6)

An alternate retirement plan for:

“(A)

A college, university, or the Department of Higher Education provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq.; and

“(B)

A vocational-technical school or the Department of Career Education provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq.;

“(7)

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System provided for under § 24-10-101 et seq.; and

“(8)

A firemen's relief and pension fund or a policemen's pension and relief fund provided for under § 24-11-101 et seq.

“(b)

If this act results in an employee who is a current member of a retirement system prior to the effective date of this act being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different retirement system than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act by written election and notice to the new employer and affected retirement system, make a one-time choice to:

“(1)

Remain in his or her same retirement system prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Become a member of the retirement system of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions for a reciprocal member to be transferred as an active member to a reciprocal system as currently provided by law under the system to which the reciprocal member is transferred.

“(c)

If this act results in an employee being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different health insurance plan than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act, make a one-time choice between:

“(1)

Continuing to participate in his or her health insurance plan prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Participating in the health insurance plan of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law.

“(d)(1)(A)

A retirement system may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (b) of this section.

“(B)

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (c) of this section.

“(2)

A policy under subdivision (d)(1) of this section is not a rule under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.”

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Cross References.

Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, § 24-11-203.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 645, § 3: Mar. 22, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the legislature intended to include all political subdivisions with fire departments when the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System was established by Act 364 of 1981, and that this Act is necessary to clarify the present misunderstanding with respect to fire improvement districts. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 955, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that various Arkansas public retirement systems have reduced the amount of service credit needed for full retirement to twenty-eight (28) years of credited service, that retirement benefits are an important incentive to keep experienced policemen and firemen on the job and to reward them for their faithful service, that experienced policemen and firemen are a valuable human resource and should be encouraged to stay on the job by keeping their fringe benefits equal with those of other public employees, and that the beginning of the state's fiscal year is the best time to implement any change in retirement benefits. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2007, No. 803, § 4: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to attract and maintain good quality employees, the State of Arkansas should always have as its goal better benefits for its employees; that the employees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System would be better served by the retirement system for which they work; and that this act is immediately necessary to transfer the retirement benefits of the employees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System from the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2011, No. 17, § 7: Feb. 9, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to account for changes in the economy, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 40, § 18: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 522, § 5: Mar. 28, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-10-101. Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter, which creates and establishes the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, is to establish a benefit program for future police officers and firefighters in Arkansas and to establish a statewide retirement system which will have the advantages of pooled administration while preserving local rights and local contribution rates.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3801.

24-10-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Accumulated contributions” means the total of all amounts contributed by a member and standing to his or her credit in his or her individual account in the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, together with regular interest thereon.

Beginning July 1, 2009, accumulated contributions shall be separated into after-tax contributions and picked-up contributions under § 24-10-404(f);

“Active member” means any member who renders actual service in a position covered by the system;

“Actual service” means service rendered in a position covered by the system.

“Actual service” does not mean purchased service, service under § 24-10-508, or reciprocal service;

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit of equal reserve value, when “reserve” means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any benefit based upon such reasonable rates of interest and tables of experience as the system shall adopt from time to time;

“Actuary” means a qualified actuary with experience in retirement plan financing.

Membership in the American Academy of Actuaries shall be sufficient for a person to be deemed a qualified actuary;

“Age” means age on last birthday;

“Annuity” means a monthly amount payable throughout the life of a person or for a temporary period;

“Beneficiary” means any person who is receiving or designated by a member to receive a plan benefit, except a retirant;

“Benefit program” means a schedule of benefits or benefit formulas from which the amounts of benefits can be determined;

“Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System;

“Covered employment” means employment as a police officer or firefighter in a position covered by the system;

“Credited service” means covered employment that is creditable as service by the system and is the total of paid service and volunteer service;

“Dependent child” means a child until his or her death, his or her marriage, or his or her attainment of eighteen (18) years of age, whichever occurs first.

The age-eighteen maximum shall be extended as long as the child continues uninterruptedly being a full-time student at an accredited secondary school, college, or university but in no event beyond the first day of the month after his or her attainment of twenty-three (23) years of age.

The age-eighteen maximum shall also be extended for any child who has been deemed physically or mentally incompetent by an Arkansas court of competent jurisdiction or by the board for as long as the incompetency exists;

“Effective date” of the system means July 1, 1981;

“Employee” means any person regularly employed by a political subdivision who receives remuneration from the political subdivision for personal services rendered as a police officer or firefighter.

“Employee” shall not include any person who acts for the political subdivision under contract or is paid on a fee basis.

“Employee” shall include any person regularly employed by the administration of the system.

“Employee” shall include a person who is a current active firefighter or police officer member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System and is an instructor at the Arkansas Fire Training Academy or the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy on or after July 1, 2013;

“Employer” means any political subdivision that has its eligible employees covered by the system or the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System as employer of its administrative staff;

“Final average pay” means the monthly average of the pays to an employee during the period of thirty-six (36) consecutive months of credited service producing the highest monthly average, but the period must be contained within the period of one hundred twenty (120) consecutive months of credited service immediately preceding his or her separation from covered employment.

Should a member have less than thirty-six (36) months of credited service, “final average pay” means the monthly average of pays to the member during the member's total months of credited service.

In any event, pays usable in determining final average pay shall be limited by the test in subdivision (17)(C)(ii) of this section, considering the final average pay period in four (4) consecutive years.

Pays during any twelve (12) consecutive months shall be usable only to the extent that the pays do not exceed thirty-one percent (31%) of the total pays in the final average pay period.

However, if the final average pay period is less than four (4) full years, the maximum usable thirty-one percent (31%) shall be increased proportionately.

For the limited purposes of calculating final average pay for disability retirement benefits under § 24-10-607, pay shall include workers' compensation benefits received by the member.

However, the pay that is increased for any month for the limited purposes of calculating this final average pay shall not be greater than the current pay attached to the rank of the member;

“Firefighter” means any regular or permanent employee of a fire department of a political subdivision, including a probationary firefighter.

“Firefighter” does not include any civilian employee of a fire department or any person temporarily employed as a firefighter during an emergency;

“General Assembly” means the General Assembly of the state;

“Inflation index” means the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers, U.S. City Average, as determined by the United States Department of Labor and in effect January 1, 1981.

Should the inflation index be restructured subsequent to 1980 in a manner materially changing its character, the board after receiving the advice of its actuary shall change the application of the inflation index so that, as far as is practicable, the 1980 intent of the use of the inflation index shall be continued;

“Joint Committee on Public Retirement” means the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs created by §§ 10-3-701 — 10-3-703, or any successor committee;

“Member” means any police officer or firefighter included in the membership of the system or a person regularly employed by the administration of the system;

“Normal retirement age” means the younger of the following ages:

Fifty-five (55) years of age if the member has at least twenty (20) years of credited service;

Sixty (60) years of age if the member has less than twenty (20) years of credited service; or

Any age if the member has twenty-eight (28) or more years of credited service;

“Operative date” of the system means January 1, 1983;

“Paid service” is covered employment that is half-time employment or more and that becomes credited service. For a calendar month in 1981 to become paid service, the police officer or firefighter shall be paid at least five hundred dollars ($500) for that month's personal services as a police officer or firefighter. For any calendar year after 1981, the monthly minimum of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be increased by any percentage increase in the inflation index for the period from October 1980 to the October immediately preceding the calendar year;

“Pay” means the recurring remuneration paid an employee for personal services rendered by the employee in a position covered by the system and shall not exceed the amount the employee is required to report for federal income tax purposes.

In determining pay, consideration shall not be given to:

Special single-sum payments paid by an employer;

Employer contributions to any employee benefit plan; or

Any other unusual or nonrecurring remuneration.

Annual compensation in excess of the limitations under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a), as it existed on January 1, 2011, shall be disregarded;

“Police officer” means any regular or permanent employee of a police department of a political subdivision, including a probationary police officer.

“Police officer” does not include any civilian employee of a police department or any person temporarily employed as a police officer during an emergency;

“Political subdivision” means:

An incorporated town;

A city of the first class;

A city of the second class;

A county;

A fire protection district that maintains standards established by the board;

A rural fire protection corporation;

A suburban improvement district;

The Arkansas Fire Training Academy; and

The Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy;

“Regular interest” means such reasonable rate or rates per annum, compounded annually, as the board shall adopt;

“Relief fund” means:

Any policemen's pension and relief fund created by state law, applicable to police officers, and covering one (1) or more persons on December 31, 1982; or

Any firemen's relief and pension fund created by state law, applicable to firefighters, and covering one (1) or more persons on December 31, 1982;

“Retirant” means a former member receiving a plan annuity by reason of having been a member;

“Social Security” means the Social Security old age, survivors, and disability insurance program, as amended;

“State” means the State of Arkansas and includes all of its duly constituted agencies;

“System” means the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System created by this chapter; and

“Volunteer service” means covered employment that becomes credited service and cannot be classified as paid service.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 2; 1983, No. 645, § 1; 1985, No. 160, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3802; Acts 1997, No. 769, § 1; 1999, No. 715, § 1; 1999, No. 863, § 1; 1999, No. 865, § 5; 1999, No. 955, § 1; 2003, No. 507, § 1; 2007, No. 803, § 2; 2011, No. 17, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 1; 2013, No. 522, §§ 1, 2; 2013, No. 1134, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (1)(B); inserted present (2) and (3) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted former (10)(B); substituted “the first day of the month after his or her attainment of twenty-three (23) years of age” for “his or her attainment of age twenty-three (23)” in (13)(B)(i); substituted “(17)(c)(ii)” for “(15)(C)(ii)” in (17)(C)(i); substituted “monthly minimum of five hundred dollars ($500)” for “five hundred dollars ($500) monthly minimum of” in (25); added “and shall not exceed the amount the employee is required to report for federal income tax purposes” in (26)(A); deleted former (26)(B) and redesignated former (26)(C) as present (26)(B); added present (26)(C); deleted former (31) and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “means” for “is” in (35).

The 2013 amendment by No. 40 substituted “the member during the member's” for “him or her during his or her” in (17)(B); in (17)(C)(i), substituted “(17)(C)(ii)” for “(17)(c)(ii)” and “consecutive years” for “contiguous segments”; and substituted “twelve (12) consecutive months” for “one (1) annual segment” in (17)(C)(ii).

The 2013 amendment by No. 522 added (15)(D), (28)(H) and (28)(I).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1134 made stylistic changes in (28).

24-10-103. Tax exemption.

The benefits payable by, and the assets of, the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are exempt from taxes by the state or any political subdivision or agency thereof.

The system shall be treated in the same manner as the Civil Service Retirement System for purposes of federal taxation.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3808.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Civil Service Retirement System, 5 U.S.C. § 2101, was replaced by the Federal Employees Retirement System (FERS) for federal employees who first entered covered service on and after January 1, 1987. See 5. U.S.C. § 8401 et seq.

24-10-104. Correction of errors.

Should any change or error in records result in any person receiving from the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall correct the error and, as far as is practicable, shall adjust the payment of the benefit in such manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which the person was correctly entitled shall be paid.

The board may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover an overpayment a person has received from the funds of the system.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3808; Acts 2009, No. 258, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added (b).

24-10-105. Penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement or who falsifies or permits to be falsified any record or records in any attempt to defraud the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall be guilty of a criminal act and upon conviction thereof shall be punished accordingly.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3808.

24-10-106. Limitation on benefit enhancement of Acts 1997, No. 769.

No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-10-102(21) shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization. No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-10-102(21) shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 769, § 2.

24-10-107. Direct deposit of insurance premium tax money in system.

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board and the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are directed to develop and adopt appropriate rules and procedures to allow insurance premium tax money that is allocated to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System to be deposited directly to the system.

The rules and procedures shall be adopted by May 1, 2004.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1737, § 1.

Subchapter 2
— Board of Trustees

Effective Dates.

Acts 1985, No. 547, § 3: Mar. 25, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that current law providing for the election of member trustees is unclear and cumbersome, and that this Act is necessary to ensure the timely replacement of representatives of the covered members of the System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 152, § 7: Feb. 21, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that confusion exists regarding whether bank trust officers may serve as investment advisers to local police and fire pension funds; that it was never the intent that bank trust officers not be authorized to so act; that this Act clarifies the law to specifically authorize bank trust officers to serve as investment advisers to the local police and fire pension funds; and that this Act should be given effect immediately in order to eliminate the confusion. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1277, § 2: Effective Jan. 1, 2004.

Acts 2011, No. 17, § 7: Feb. 9, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to account for changes in the economy, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 556, § 6: Mar. 22, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to account for changes in the economy, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 40, § 18: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-10-201. Members and terms.

The general administration and the responsibility for the proper operation of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System and for making effective the provisions of this chapter are vested in a board of trustees of seven (7) persons as follows:

One (1) person to be appointed member trustee by the Governor after consulting the Arkansas Professional Fire Fighters Association and the Arkansas State Firefighters Association and subject to confirmation by the Senate;

One (1) person to be appointed member trustee by the Governor after consulting the Arkansas Municipal Police Association and the Arkansas Fraternal Order of Police and subject to confirmation by the Senate;

Two (2) persons to be appointed employer trustees by the Governor after consulting the Arkansas Municipal League and subject to confirmation by the Senate;

One (1) person who is not a member, retirant, or beneficiary of the system and who is not a member of the governing body of any political subdivision to be appointed trustee by the Governor from a list of persons submitted to him or her by the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs;

One (1) person who is a retired municipal police officer to be appointed a member trustee by the Governor from a list of two (2) persons submitted to him or her by the cochairs of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs; and

One (1) person who is a retired municipal firefighter to be appointed a member trustee by the Governor from a list of two (2) persons submitted to him or her by the cochairs of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs.

The normal term of office for a trustee shall be four (4) years from January 1 next following his or her election or appointment, as the case may be.

Each trustee shall continue to serve as trustee until a successor is appointed and has qualified.

Trustees elected or appointed as member trustees shall be retired or active members of the system, but:

Not more than one (1) member trustee shall be employed or formerly employed by any one (1) employer;

Not more than two (2) member trustees shall be police officers or retired police officers; and

Not more than two (2) member trustees shall be firefighters or retired firefighters.

Trustees appointed as employer trustees shall be elected or appointed officials of employers with management experience and shall not be members of the system, but not more than one (1) employer trustee shall be from any one (1) employer.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 7; 1985, No. 547, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3807; Acts 2003, No. 1277, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 2; 2015, No. 1100, § 58.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2003, No. 1277, § 2 provided:

“(a)

This act is effective January 1, 2004.

“(b)(1)

Under section 1 of this act, the initial new two (2) member trustees to be appointed by Governor from lists submitted by the cochairs of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall be appointed for staggered terms to expire each year over a two-year period and the terms shall be designated by the Governor.

“(2)

After the initial terms, the two (2) member trustees to be appointed by Governor from lists submitted by the cochairs of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall serve terms as the other trustees for four (4) years.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “Arkansas State Firefighters Association” for “Arkansas Council of Professional Fire Fighters” in (a)(1).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(1) through (a)(3); and deleted former (e).

24-10-202. Vacancies.

In the event any member trustee ceases to be a member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, or if any employer trustee ceases to be an appointed or elected official of an employer or becomes a member of the system, or if the citizen trustee becomes a member of the system or an elected or appointed official of an employer, or if any trustee fails to attend three (3) consecutive meetings of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, unless in each case excused for cause by the remaining trustees attending the meetings, he or she shall be considered as having resigned from the board, and the board by resolution shall declare his or her office of trustee vacated.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of trustee, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the office was previously filled.

From the time a vacancy in the office of trustee occurs and the board has begun the steps to see that the vacancy will be filled, and before the time the vacancy is filled, the trustees in office by majority vote may elect a person to fill temporarily the vacancy for the interim period but in no event for a period longer than one (1) year.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3807.

24-10-203. Proceedings.

Each trustee shall be entitled to one (1) vote on the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

Three (3) votes shall be necessary for a decision by the trustees at any meeting of the board.

Three (3) trustees, of whom at least one (1) shall be a member trustee and at least one (1) shall be an employer trustee, shall constitute a quorum at any meeting of the board.

Unless otherwise expressly provided in this section, a meeting need not be called or held to make any decision on a matter before the board. Each member must be sent, by the Executive Director of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, a copy of the matter to be decided with full information from the files of the board. The concurring decisions of three (3) trustees may decide the issue by signing a document declaring their decision and sending the written instrument to the executive director, but only if no other trustee shall send a dissenting decision to the executive director within fifteen (15) days after the document and information were mailed to him or her. If any trustee is not in agreement with the three (3) trustees, the matter is to be passed on at a regular board meeting or a special meeting called for that purpose.

Meetings of the board may be called by the chair or by a majority of the members in a manner established by the board.

The board shall serve as trustees without compensation for their services as such.

However, each trustee may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the board shall formulate and adopt rules for the government of its own proceedings and for the administration of the system.

The board shall elect one (1) of its members as chair and one (1) of its members as vice chair.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3807; Acts 1995, No. 514, § 3; 1997, No. 250, § 233; 2019, No. 315, § 2894.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

24-10-204. Employees.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall employ an executive director, not one of its number, for at least three (3) years, who shall be the executive officer of the board.

Other employees of the board shall be chosen only upon the recommendation of the Executive Director of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

After the operative date, the board shall appoint an actuary or a firm of actuaries to be a technical advisor to the board on matters regarding the operation of the system on an actuarial basis. The actuary shall perform such duties as are required of him or her under this chapter and as are from time to time required by the board.

The board shall appoint an attorney at law, or firm of attorneys at law, to be the legal advisor of the board and to represent the board in all legal proceedings.

The board shall appoint an investment advisor, as defined in § 24-10-402.

The board shall arrange for annual audits of the records and accounts of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System by a certified public accountant or by a firm of certified public accountants.

The Division of Legislative Audit shall examine the audits at least one (1) time every three (3) years and report to the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs, the Legislative Council, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, and the Governor.

The executive director shall be:

The Plan Administrator of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System;

The appointing authority in the employment of other professional and clerical employees of the system; and

Responsible for the purchase of such equipment and supplies as are required for the proper operation of the system, subject to the approval of the board.

The pay of the persons engaged by the system shall be consistent with the pay plan of the state.

All other expenses of the board necessary for the operation of the system shall be paid at such rates and in such amounts as the board shall approve.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 7; 1983, No. 676, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3807; Acts 1989, No. 152, § 1; 2011, No. 17, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment subdivided and rewrote (f).

24-10-205. Records and reports.

After receiving the advice of its actuary, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall from time to time adopt such mortality and other tables of experience, and rates of regular interest, as shall be necessary for the actuarial requirements of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

It shall require the Executive Director of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System to keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for actuarial investigations of the experiences of the system and such data as shall be necessary for the annual actuarial valuations of the system.

The board shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall be open to public inspection.

The board shall prepare annually and render to each employer a report showing the financial condition of the system. The report shall contain, but shall not be limited to:

A financial balance sheet;

A statement of income and disbursements;

A detailed statement of investments acquired and disposed of during the year, including a composite rate of return on the investments;

A summary of the results of the last actuarial valuation of the system; and

Such other data as the board shall deem necessary or desirable for a proper understanding of the condition of the system.

The board shall determine and decide all questions of doubt raised by any provisions of this chapter.

The headquarters of the system shall be located within twenty-five (25) miles of the State Capitol Building.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3807.